Utah statutes.
49-18-501.   Death benefit for members before retirement -- Computation.

(1)  Upon the receipt of acceptable proof of death of a member before the member's retirement date, the member's spouse at the time of death shall have the choice of the following death benefits:

(a)  a refund of the member's member contributions, if any, plus 65% of the member's most recent 12 months' compensation prior to death; or

(b)  an allowance equal to 65% of the allowance computed in accordance with Section 49-18-402, but disregarding early retirement reductions.

(2)  If there is no spouse to whom the member is married at the time of death, member contributions shall be refunded to a beneficiary, in accordance with Sections 49-11-609 and 49-11-610.

(3) (a)  A spouse who requests a benefit under this section shall apply in writing to the office.

(b)  The allowance shall begin on the first day of the month:

(i)  following the month in which the member died, if the application is received by the office within 90 days of the member's death; or

(ii)  following the month in which the application is received by the office, if the application is received by the office more than 90 days after the member's death.

